Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.240

Violations by signers, officers—Recall petitions—Penalty.

(1) Every person who signs a recall petition with any other than his or her true name is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Every person who knowingly (a) signs more than one petition for the same recall, (b) signs a recall petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or (c) makes a false statement as to residence on any recall petition is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(3) Every registration officer who makes any false report or certificate on any recall petition is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2004 c 266 s 19. Prior: 2003 c 111 s 2112; 2003 c 53 s 183; 1984 c 170 s 11; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.170; prior: 1913 c 146 s 15; RRS s 5364. Formerly RCW 29.82.170, 29.82.180, 29.82.190, 29.82.200.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Misconduct in signing a petition: RCW 9.44.080.